Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.071

Information concerning problem gambling—Self-exclusion program—Fee increases.

(1) The legislature recognizes that some individuals in this state are negatively impacted by problem gambling and gambling disorder. Because the state promotes and regulates gambling through the activities of the state lottery commission, the Washington horse racing commission, and the Washington state gambling commission, the state has the responsibility to continue to provide resources for the support of problem gambling services. Therefore, the Washington state gambling commission, the Washington horse racing commission, and the state lottery commission shall maintain placement of problem gambling and gambling disorder informational signs which include a toll-free helpline number for problem gambling and gambling disorder. The signs shall be placed in the establishments of gambling licensees, horse racing licensees, and lottery retailers.

The Washington state gambling commission, the Washington horse racing commission, and the state lottery commission may also contract with other qualified entities to provide public awareness, training, and other services to ensure the intent of this section is fulfilled.

(2) Individuals and families impacted by problem gambling or gambling disorder will benefit from the availability of a uniform self-exclusion program where people may voluntarily exclude themselves from gambling at multiple gambling establishments by submitting one self-exclusion form to the state from one location for all gambling activities. Therefore, the Washington state gambling commission must establish a statewide self-exclusion program for all licensees. The commission has discretion in establishing the scope, process, and requirements of the self-exclusion program, including denying, suspending, or revoking an application, license, or permit. However, the initial program must comply with the following minimum requirements:

(a) The program must allow persons to voluntarily exclude themselves from gambling at authorized gambling establishments that offer house-banked social card games;

(b) The program must have a process for federally recognized Indian tribes or tribal enterprises that own gambling operations or facilities with class III gaming compacts to voluntarily participate in the self-exclusion program;

(c)(i) Any individual registered with the self-exclusion program created under this section is prohibited from participating in gambling activities associated with this program and forfeits all moneys and things of value obtained by the individual or owed to the individual by an authorized gambling establishment as a result of prohibited wagers or gambling activities. The commission may adopt rules for the forfeiture of any moneys or things of value, including wagers, obtained by an authorized gambling establishment while an individual is registered with the self-exclusion program created under this section.

(ii) Moneys and things of value forfeited under the self-exclusion program must be distributed to the problem gambling account created in RCW 41.05.751 and/or a charitable or nonprofit organization that provides problem gambling services or increases awareness about problem gambling pursuant to rules adopted by the commission; and

(d) The commission must adopt rules establishing the self-exclusion program by June 30, 2021.

(3) An individual who participates in the self-exclusion program does not have a cause of action against the state of Washington, the commission, or any gambling establishment, its employees, or officers for any acts or omissions in processing or enforcing the requirements of the self-exclusion program, including a failure to prevent an individual from gambling at an authorized gambling establishment.

(4) Any personal information collected, stored, or accessed under the self-exclusion program may only be used for the administration of the self-exclusion program and may not be disseminated for any purpose other than the administration of the self-exclusion program.

(5)(a) During any period in which RCW 82.04.285(2) is in effect, the commission may not increase fees payable by licensees under its jurisdiction for the purpose of funding services for problem gambling and gambling disorder. Any fee imposed or increased by the commission, for the purpose of funding these services, before July 1, 2005, has no force and effect after July 1, 2005.

(b) During any period in which RCW 82.04.285(2) is not in effect:

(i) The commission, the Washington state horse racing commission, and the state lottery commission may contract for services, in addition to those authorized in subsection (1) of this section, to assist in providing for problem gambling and gambling disorder treatment; and

(ii) The commission may increase fees payable by licensees under its jurisdiction for the purpose of funding the problem gambling and gambling disorder services authorized in this section.

[ 2023 c 284 s 6; 2019 c 213 s 1; 2005 c 369 s 9; 2003 c 75 s 1; 1994 c 218 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2023 c 284: See notes following RCW 41.05.750.

Findings—Intent—Severability—Effective date—2005 c 369: See notes following RCW 41.05.750.

Effective date—1994 c 218: See note following RCW 9.46.010.